Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0341.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) This section applies to all law enforcement officers except individuals to whom sections 9a, 9b, 9c, and 9d apply. Employment of law enforcement officers to whom this section applies is subject to the licensing requirements and procedures of this section and section sections 9e and 9f. An individual who seeks admission to a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy or a regional basic law enforcement training academy or the recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for purposes of licensure under this section shall submit to fingerprinting as provided in section 11(3). (2) The commission shall promulgate rules governing licensing standards and procedures for individuals licensed under this section. In promulgating the rules, the commission shall give consideration to the varying factors and special requirements of law enforcement agencies. Rules promulgated under this subsection must pertain to the following: (a) Subject to section sections 9e and 9f, training requirements that may be met by completing either of the following: (i) Preenrollment requirements, courses of study, attendance requirements, and instructional hours at an agency basic law enforcement training academy, a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy, or a regional basic law enforcement training academy. (ii) The recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for granting a waiver from the licensing standard specified in subparagraph (i). (b) Proficiency on a licensing examination administered after compliance with the licensing standard specified in subdivision (a). (c) Physical ability. (d) Psychological fitness. (e) Education. (f) Reading and writing proficiency. (g) Minimum age. (h) Whether or not a valid operator's or chauffeur's license is required for licensure. (i) Character fitness, as determined by a comprehensive background investigation supported by a written authorization and release waiver executed by the individual for whom licensure is sought. The waiver and comprehensive background investigation required under this subdivision must contain information required by the commission. The waiver must be in a form prescribed by the commission. (j) Whether or not United States citizenship is required for licensure. (k) Employment as a law enforcement officer. (l) The form and manner for execution of a written oath of office by a law enforcement agency with whom the individual is employed, and the content of the written oath conferring authority to act with all of the law enforcement authority described in the laws of this state under which the individual is employed. (m) The ability to be licensed and employed as a law enforcement officer under this section, without a restriction otherwise imposed by law. (3) The licensure process under this section must follow the following procedures: (a) Before executing the oath of office, an employing law enforcement agency verifies shall do both of the following: (i) Verify that the individual to whom the oath is to be administered complies with licensing standards. If the individual is a licensed law enforcement officer who is or was employed by another law enforcement agency, the subsequent employing law enforcement agency's verification and attestation to compliance with licensing standards may exclude the licensing standards described in subsection (2)(a), (b), and (e) to (g). (ii) If applicable, verify in writing that it has reviewed the law enforcement officer's separation of service record from a former law enforcement agency as required under the law enforcement officer separation of service record act, 2017 PA 128, MCL 28.561 to 28.565. (b) A law enforcement agency employing an individual licensed whom the law enforcement agency seeks to license under this section authorizes the individual to exercise the law enforcement authority described in the laws of this state under which the individual is employed, by executing shall require the individual to execute a written oath of office. (c) Not more than 10 calendar days after executing the oath of office, the An employing law enforcement agency shall attest in writing to the commission that the individual to whom the oath was administered satisfies the licensing standards by submitting an executed affidavit, and a copy of the executed oath of office, and any other documents required by the commission. (4) If, upon reviewing the executed affidavit and executed oath of office, the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards, Upon receipt of the documents required under this section from an employing law enforcement agency, the commission shall review the documents to determine whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. The commission may require the employing law enforcement agency to provide physical or electronic copies of the comprehensive background investigation obtained under this section or any other documents the commission considers necessary. After reviewing all the documents required under this section, the commission shall grant the individual a license if the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards. (5) If , upon reviewing the executed affidavit and executed oath of office, the commission determines that the individual does not comply with the licensing standards, the commission may do any of the following: (a) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the affidavit and oath of office. (b) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the comprehensive background investigation, screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and other means used to verify compliance with the licensing standards. (c) Supervise Grant the individual a license if the commission determines that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and or other means used to determine compliance with the licensing standards.of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, provided that the individual agrees to do both of the following: (i) Comply with any additional screening, procedures, examination, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, as determined by the commission as a condition for granting the individual a license. (ii) Voluntarily relinquish the license if the individual fails to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (i). (d) Deny the issuance of a license and inform the employing law enforcement agency. (6) Upon being informed that An individual is not licensed under this section until the commission grants the individual a license in accordance with this act. If the commission has denied denies the issuance of a license, the employing law enforcement agency shall promptly inform the individual whose licensure was denied. (7) An individual denied a license under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in the laws of this state under which the individual is employed. This subsection does not divest the individual of that authority until the individual has been informed that his or her licensure was denied. (7) (8) A law enforcement agency that has administered an oath of office to an individual under this section shall do all of the following, with respect to that individual: (a) Report to the commission all personnel transactions affecting employment status in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) Report to the commission concerning any action taken by the employing agency that removes the authority conferred by the oath of office, or that restores the individual's authority to that conferred by the oath of office, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) Report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed by that individual of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (i) All criminal charges for offenses for which that individual's license may be revoked. (ii) The imposition of a personal protection order against the individual under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. (iii) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or under the laws of any other state. (iv) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subparagraph, the law enforcement agency shall specify the conviction, whether the individual is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (d) (c) Maintain an employment history record. (e) (d) Collect, verify, and maintain documentation establishing that the individual complies with the licensing standards. (8) (9) An individual licensed under this section shall report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (a) Criminal charges for offenses for which that individual's license may be revoked as described in this section. , upon being informed of such charges, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) The imposition of a personal protection order against that individual after a judicial hearing under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. , upon being informed of the imposition of such an order, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) The imposition of a personal protection order against the individual under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or the laws of any other state. (d) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or the laws of any other state. (e) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subdivision, the individual shall specify the conviction, whether the individual is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (9) (10) A license issued under this section is rendered inactive, and may be reactivated, as follows: (a) A license is rendered inactive if 1 or more of the following occur: (i) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for fewer than 2,080 hours in aggregate, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for less than 1 year. (ii) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for fewer than 2,080 hours in aggregate, is thereafter continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the oath of office for less than 1 year. (iii) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for 2,080 hours or longer in aggregate, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for less than 2 years. (iv) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for 2,080 hours or longer in aggregate, is continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the oath of office for less than 2 years. (v) An individual, having failed to comply with the continuing professional education requirements prescribed in rules by the commission, is notified in writing through the individual's employing law enforcement agency by the commission that the individual's license has been rendered inactive. (b) An employing law enforcement agency may reactivate a license rendered inactive by complying with the licensure procedures described in subsection subsections (3) and (4), excluding verification of and attestation to compliance with the licensing standards described in subsection (2)(a) to (g).(2)(a), (b), and (e) to (g). (c) A license that has been reactivated under this section is valid for all purposes described in this act. (10) (11) A license issued under this section is rendered lapsed, without barring further licensure under this act, if 1 or more of the following occur: (a) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for fewer than 2,080 hours in aggregate, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for 1 year. (b) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for fewer than 2,080 hours in aggregate, is thereafter continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the oath of office for 1 year. (c) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for 2,080 hours or longer in aggregate, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for 2 years. (d) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer for 2,080 hours or longer in aggregate, is continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the oath of office for 2 years. (e) An individual, having failed to comply with the continuing professional education requirements prescribed in rules by the commission for 1 year, is notified in writing through the individual's employing law enforcement agency by the commission that the individual's license has lapsed. (11) (12) The commission shall revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection: (a) The individual obtained the license by making a materially false oral or written statement or committing fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (b) The individual obtained the license because another individual made a materially false oral or written statement or committed fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (c) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for a violation or attempted violation of a penal law of this state or another jurisdiction that is punishable by imprisonment for more than 1 year. (d) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for violation or attempted violation of 1 or more of the following penal laws of this state or laws of another jurisdiction substantially corresponding to the penal laws of this state: (i) Section 625(1) or (8) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, if the individual has a prior conviction, as that term is defined in section 625(25)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, that occurred within 7 years of the adjudication as described in section 625(9)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625. (ii) Section 7403(2)(c) or 7404(2)(a), (b), or (c) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403 and 333.7404. (iii) Section 81(4) or 81a or a misdemeanor violation of section 411h of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, 750.81a, and 750.411h. (e) The individual is convicted of a misdemeanor involving domestic violence and is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f(5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (12) The commission may revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection: (a) The individual is a law enforcement officer with an active license at another law enforcement agency and both of the following apply: (i) The subsequent employing law enforcement agency requests the activation of the individual's law enforcement officer license under this act. (ii) The commission determines that the individual does not meet the licensing standards and denies the request of the subsequent employing law enforcement agency to activate the individual's law enforcement officer license. (b) The individual's license was activated by the commission in accordance with this act within 90 days of the commission's initiation of revocation proceedings, and both of the following apply: (i) The commission determines that the individual's license was activated in error, including an erroneous activation before the commission issued a final order determining whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. (ii) The commission determines that the individual does not comply with the licensing standards and would have denied activation of the individual's license under this act but for the error. (c) The individual's license was granted under this act based on the commission's determination that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards and the individual failed to comply with the additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards imposed by the commission to verify the individual's compliance with the licensing standards. (d) The individual is not eligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm or an ammunition under state or federal laws. (13) The following procedures and requirements apply to license revocation under this section: (a) The commission shall initiate license revocation proceedings, including, but not limited to, the issuance of an order of summary suspension and notice of intent to revoke, upon obtaining notice of facts warranting license revocation. (b) A hearing for license revocation must be conducted as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (c) In lieu of participating in a contested case, an individual may voluntarily and permanently relinquish his or her the individual's law enforcement officer license by executing before a notary public an affidavit of license relinquishment prescribed by the commission. (d) The commission need not delay or abate license revocation proceedings based on an adjudication of guilt if an appeal is taken from the adjudication of guilt. (e) If the commission issues a final decision or order to revoke a license, that decision or order is subject to judicial review as provided in the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A summary suspension described in this section is not a final decision or order for purposes of judicial review. (14) An Only an individual licensed with an active law enforcement license issued under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in the laws of this state. under which the individual is employed if any of the following occur: (a) The individual's license is rendered void by a court order or other operation of law. (b) The individual's license is revoked. (c) The individual's license is rendered inactive. (d) The individual's license is rendered lapsed. Sec. 9a. (1) This section applies only to individuals elected or appointed to the office of sheriff in this state. Employment of law enforcement officers to whom this section applies is subject to the licensing requirements and procedures of this section. (2) The licensure process under this section shall must comply with the following procedures: (a) Not more than 10 calendar days after taking an oath of office for the office of sheriff in this state, an individual shall submit to the commission a copy of the executed oath of office. (b) If, upon reviewing the executed oath of office, the commission determines that the individual has been elected or appointed to the office of sheriff in this state, the commission shall grant the individual a license. (c) If, upon reviewing the executed oath of office, the commission determines that the individual has not been elected or appointed to the office of sheriff in this state, the commission may do either of the following: (i) Verify, through other means, election or appointment to the office of sheriff in this state. (ii) Deny the issuance of a license and inform the individual denied. (3) An individual licensed under this section shall report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (a) Criminal charges for offenses for which that individual's license may be revoked as described in this section. , upon being informed of such charges, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) The imposition of a personal protection order against that individual after a judicial hearing under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. , upon being informed of the imposition of such an order, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or under the laws of any other state. (d) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subdivision, the individual shall specify the conviction, whether the individual is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (4) A license granted under this section is valid until any of the following occur: (a) A court order or other operation of law renders the license void. (b) The individual's term of office as a sheriff in this state expires. (c) The commission revokes the license as provided in this section. (5) The commission shall revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection: (a) The individual obtained the license by making a materially false oral or written statement or committing fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (b) The individual obtained the license because another individual made a materially false oral or written statement or committed fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (c) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for a violation or attempted violation of a penal law of this state or another jurisdiction that is punishable by imprisonment for more than 1 year. (d) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for violation or attempted violation of 1 or more of the following penal laws of this state or laws of another jurisdiction substantially corresponding to the penal laws of this state: (i) Section 625(1) or (8) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, if the individual has a prior conviction, as that term is defined in section 625(25)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, that occurred within 7 years of the adjudication as described in section 625(9)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625. (ii) Sections 7403(2)(c) and 7404(2)(a), (b), and (c) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403 and 333.7404. (iii) Sections 81(4) and 81a and a misdemeanor violation of section 411h of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, 750.81a, and 750.411h. (e) The individual is convicted of a misdemeanor involving domestic violence and is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f(5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (6) The commission may revoke a license granted under this section and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection if the individual is not eligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm or an ammunition under state or federal laws. (7) (6) The following procedures and requirements apply to license revocation under this section: (a) The commission shall initiate license revocation proceedings, including, but not limited to, the issuance of an order of summary suspension and notice of intent to revoke, upon obtaining notice of facts warranting license revocation. (b) A hearing for license revocation shall must be conducted as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (c) In lieu of participating in a contested case, an individual may voluntarily and permanently relinquish his or her the individual's law enforcement officer license by executing before a notary public an affidavit of license relinquishment prescribed by the commission. (d) The commission need not delay or abate license revocation proceedings based on an adjudication of guilt if an appeal is taken from the adjudication of guilt. (e) If the commission issues a final decision or order to revoke a license, that decision or order is subject to judicial review as provided in the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A summary suspension described in this section is not a final decision or order for purposes of judicial review. Sec. 9b. (1) This section applies only to individuals who are employed as Michigan tribal law enforcement officers in this state and are subject to a written instrument authorizing them to enforce the laws of this state. Conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state to law enforcement officers to whom this section applies is subject to the licensing requirements and procedures of this section and section sections 9e and 9f. An individual who seeks admission to a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy or a regional basic law enforcement training academy or the recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for purposes of licensure under this section shall submit to fingerprinting as provided in section 11(3). (2) The commission shall promulgate rules governing licensing standards and procedures, pertaining to the following: (a) Subject to section sections 9e and 9f, training requirements that may be met by completing either of the following: (i) Preenrollment requirements, courses of study, attendance requirements, and instructional hours at an agency basic law enforcement training academy, a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy, or a regional basic law enforcement training academy. (ii) The recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for granting a waiver from the licensing standard specified in subparagraph (i). (b) Proficiency on a licensing examination administered after compliance with the licensing standard specified in subdivision (a). (c) Physical ability. (d) Psychological fitness. (e) Education. (f) Reading and writing proficiency. (g) Minimum age. (h) Whether or not a valid operator's or chauffeur's license is required for licensure. (i) Character fitness, as determined by a comprehensive background investigation supported by a written authorization and release waiver executed by the individual for whom licensure is sought. The waiver and comprehensive background investigation required under this subdivision must contain information required by the commission. The waiver must be in a form prescribed by the commission. (j) Whether or not United States citizenship is required for licensure. (k) Employment as a Michigan tribal law enforcement officer. (l) The form and manner for execution of a written instrument conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state, consisting of any of the following: (i) Deputation by a sheriff of this state, conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state. (ii) Appointment as a law enforcement officer by a law enforcement agency, conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state. (iii) Execution of a written agreement between the Michigan tribal law enforcement agency with whom the individual is employed and a law enforcement agency, conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state. (iv) Execution of a written agreement between this state, or a subdivision of this state, and the United States, conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state. (m) The ability to be licensed and employed as a law enforcement officer under this section, without a restriction otherwise imposed by law. (3) The licensure process under this section must follow the following procedures: (a) A law enforcement agency or other governmental agency conferring authority upon a Michigan tribal law enforcement officer as provided in this section shall confer the authority to enforce the laws of this state by executing a written instrument as provided in this section. (b) Before executing the written instrument, a law enforcement agency or other governmental agency shall verify do both of the following: (i) Verify that the individual complies with the licensing standards. If the individual is a licensed law enforcement officer who is or was employed by another Michigan tribal law enforcement agency or other governmental agency, the verification and attestation to compliance with licensing standards by the subsequent law enforcement agency or other governmental agency may exclude the licensing standards described in subsection (2)(a), (b), and (e) to (g). (ii) If applicable, verify in writing that it has reviewed the law enforcement officer's separation of service record from a former employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency as required under the law enforcement officer separation of service record act, 2017 PA 128, MCL 28.561 to 28.565. (c) Not more than 10 calendar days after the effective date of the written instrument, the A law enforcement agency or other governmental agency executing the written instrument shall attest in writing to the commission that the individual to whom the authority was conferred satisfies the licensing standards, by submitting an executed affidavit, and a copy of the written instrument, and any other documents required by the commission. (4) If, upon reviewing the executed affidavit and the written instrument, the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards, Upon receipt of the documents required under this section from a Michigan tribal law enforcement agency or other governmental agency, the commission shall review the documents to determine whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. The commission may require the law enforcement agency or other governmental agency to provide physical or electronic copies of the comprehensive background investigation obtained under this section or any other documents the commission considers necessary. After reviewing all the documents required under this section, the commission shall grant the individual a license if the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards. (5) If , upon reviewing the executed affidavit and the written instrument, the commission determines that the individual does not comply with the licensing standards, the commission may do any of the following: (a) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the affidavit and oath of office. (b) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the comprehensive background investigation, screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and other means used to verify compliance with the licensing standards. (c) Supervise Grant the individual a license if the commission determines that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and or other means used to determine compliance with the licensing standards.of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, provided that the individual agrees to do both of the following: (i) Comply with any additional screening, procedures, examination, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, as determined by the commission as a condition for granting the individual a license. (ii) Voluntarily relinquish the license if the individual fails to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (i). (d) Deny the issuance of a license and inform the law enforcement agency or other governmental agency conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state upon an individual to whom this section applies. (6) Upon being informed that An individual is not licensed under this section until the commission grants the individual a license in accordance with this act. If the commission has denied denies the issuance of a license, a law enforcement agency or other governmental agency conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state upon an individual to whom this section applies shall promptly inform the individual denied. (7) An individual denied a license under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in a written instrument conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state. This subsection does not divest the individual of that authority until the individual has been informed that his or her license was denied. (7) (8) A written instrument conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state upon an individual to whom this section applies must include the following requirements: (a) A requirement that That the employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency report to the commission all personnel transactions affecting employment status in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) A requirement that That the employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency report to the commission concerning any action it takes that removes the authority conferred by the written instrument conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state or that restores the individual's authority to that conferred by the written instrument, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) A requirement that That the employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency maintain an employment history record. (d) A requirement that That the employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency collect, verify, and maintain documentation establishing that the individual complies with the applicable licensing standards. (8) (9) A written instrument conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state upon an individual to whom this section applies must include a requirement that the employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency report the following regarding an individual licensed under this section immediately upon being informed by that individual of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (a) Criminal charges for offenses for which that individual's license may be revoked as described in this section. , upon being informed of such charges, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) The imposition of a personal protection order against that individual after a judicial hearing under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. , upon being informed of the imposition of such an order, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or under the laws of any other state. (d) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subdivision, the employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency shall specify the conviction, whether the individual is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (9) (10) A license issued under this section is rendered inactive, and may be reactivated, as follows: (a) A license is rendered inactive if 1 or more of the following occur: (i) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for less than 2,080 hours, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for less than 1 year. (ii) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for less than 2,080 hours, is thereafter continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the written instrument authorizing the individual to enforce the laws of this state for less than 1 year. (iii) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for 2,080 hours or longer, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for less than 2 years. (iv) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for 2,080 hours or longer, is continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the written instrument authorizing the individual to enforce the laws of this state for less than 2 years. (v) An individual, having failed to comply with the continuing professional education requirements prescribed in rules by the commission, is notified in writing through the individual's employing law enforcement agency by the commission that the individual's license has been rendered inactive. (b) A law enforcement agency or other governmental agency conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state upon an individual to whom this section applies may reactivate a license rendered inactive by complying with the licensure procedures described in subsection subsections (3) and (4), excluding verification of and attestation to compliance with the licensing standards described in subsection (2)(a) to (g).(2)(a), (b), and (e) to (g). (c) A license that has been reactivated under this section is valid for all purposes described in this act. (10) (11) A license issued under this section is rendered lapsed, without barring further licensure under this act, if 1 or more of the following occur: (a) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for less than 2,080 hours, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for 1 year. (b) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for less than 2,080 hours, is thereafter continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the written instrument authorizing the individual to enforce the laws of this state for 1 year. (c) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for 2,080 hours or longer, is thereafter continuously not employed as a law enforcement officer for 2 years. (d) An individual, having been employed as a law enforcement officer in aggregate for 2,080 hours or longer, is continuously subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the written instrument authorizing the individual to enforce the laws of this state for 2 years. (e) An individual, having failed to comply with the continuing professional education requirements prescribed in rules by the commission for 1 year, is notified in writing through the individual's employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency by the commission that the individual's license has lapsed. (11) (12) The commission shall revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing these revocations under this section: (a) The individual obtained the license by making a materially false oral or written statement or committing fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (b) The individual obtained the license because another individual made a materially false oral or written statement or committed fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (c) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for a violation or attempted violation of a penal law of this state or another jurisdiction that is punishable by imprisonment for more than 1 year. (d) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for violation or attempted violation of 1 or more of the following penal laws of this state or laws of another jurisdiction substantially corresponding to the penal laws of this state: (i) Section 625(1) or (8) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, if the individual has a prior conviction, as that term is defined in section 625(25)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, that occurred within 7 years of the adjudication as described in section 625(9)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625. (ii) Section 7403(2)(c) or 7404(2)(a), (b), or (c) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403 and 333.7404. (iii) Section 81(4) or 81a or a misdemeanor violation of section 411h of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, 750.81a, and 750.411h. (e) The individual is convicted of a misdemeanor involving domestic violence and is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f(5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (12) The commission may revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection: (a) The individual is a law enforcement officer with an active license at another Michigan tribal law enforcement agency and both of the following apply: (i) The subsequent employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency requests the activation of the individual's law enforcement officer license under this act. (ii) The commission determines that the individual does not meet the licensing standards and denies the request of the subsequent employing Michigan tribal law enforcement agency to activate the individual's law enforcement officer license. (b) The individual's license was activated by the commission in accordance with this act within 90 days of the commission's initiation of revocation proceedings, and both of the following apply: (i) The commission determines that the individual's license was activated in error, including an erroneous activation before the commission issued a final order determining whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. (ii) The commission determines that the individual does not comply with the licensing standards and would have denied activation of the individual's license under this act but for the error. (c) The individual's license was granted under this act based on the commission's determination that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards and the individual failed to comply with the additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards imposed by the commission to verify the individual's compliance with the licensing standards. (d) The individual is not eligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm or an ammunition under state or federal laws. (13) The following procedures and requirements apply to license revocation under this section: (a) The commission shall initiate license revocation proceedings, including, but not limited to, the issuance of an order of summary suspension and notice of intent to revoke, upon obtaining notice of facts warranting license revocation. (b) A hearing for license revocation must be conducted as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (c) In lieu of participating in a contested case, an individual may voluntarily and permanently relinquish his or her the individual's law enforcement officer license by executing before a notary public an affidavit of license relinquishment prescribed by the commission. (d) The commission need not delay or abate license revocation proceedings based on an adjudication of guilt if an appeal is taken from the adjudication of guilt. (e) If the commission issues a final decision or order to revoke a license, that decision or order is subject to judicial review as provided in the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A summary suspension described in this section is not a final decision or order for purposes of judicial review. (14) An Only an individual licensed with an active law enforcement license issued under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in a written instrument conferring authority upon the individual to enforce the laws of this state. if any of the following occur: (a) The individual's license is rendered void by a court order or other operation of law. (b) The individual's license is revoked. (c) The individual's license is rendered inactive. (d) The individual's license is rendered lapsed. Sec. 9c. (1) This section applies only to individuals who are employed as fire arson investigators from fire departments within villages, cities, townships, or counties in this state, who are sworn and fully empowered by the chiefs of police of those villages, cities, townships, or counties. Conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state to law enforcement officers to whom this section applies is subject to the licensing requirements and procedures of this section and section sections 9e and 9f. An individual who seeks admission to a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy or a regional basic law enforcement training academy or the recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for purposes of licensure under this section shall submit to fingerprinting as provided in section 11(3). (2) The commission shall promulgate rules governing licensing standards and procedures, pertaining to the following: (a) Subject to section sections 9e and 9f, training requirements that may be met by completing either of the following: (i) Preenrollment requirements, courses of study, attendance requirements, and instructional hours at an agency basic law enforcement training academy, a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy, or a regional basic law enforcement training academy. (ii) The recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for granting a waiver from the licensing standard specified in subparagraph (i). (b) Proficiency on a licensing examination administered after compliance with the licensing standard specified in subdivision (a). (c) Physical ability. (d) Psychological fitness. (e) Education. (f) Reading and writing proficiency. (g) Minimum age. (h) Whether or not a valid operator's or chauffeur's license is required for licensure. (i) Character fitness, as determined by a comprehensive background investigation supported by a written authorization and release waiver executed by the individual for whom licensure is sought. The waiver and comprehensive background investigation required under this subdivision must contain information required by the commission. The waiver must be in a form prescribed by the commission. (j) Whether or not United States citizenship is required for licensure. (k) Employment as a fire arson investigator from a fire department within a village, city, township, or county in this state, who is sworn and fully empowered by the chief of police of that village, city, township, or county. (l) The form and manner for execution of a written oath of office by the chief of police of a village, city, township, or county law enforcement agency, and the content of the written oath conferring authority to enforce the laws of this state. (m) The ability to be licensed and employed as a law enforcement officer under this section, without a restriction otherwise imposed by law. (3) The licensure process under this section must follow the following procedures: (a) Before executing the oath of office, the chief of police shall verify do both of the following: (i) Verify that the individual to whom the oath is to be administered complies with the licensing standards. If the individual is a licensed fire arson investigator who is or was employed by another fire department, the subsequent employing chief of police's verification and attestation to compliance with licensing standards may exclude the licensing standards described in subsection (2)(a), (b), and (e) to (g). (ii) If applicable, verify in writing that it has reviewed the individual's separation of service record from a former fire department as required under the law enforcement officer separation of service record act, 2017 PA 128, MCL 28.561 to 28.565. (b) The chief of police shall require the individual to execute an a written oath of office. authorizing the individual to enforce the laws of this state. (c) Not more than 10 calendar days after executing the oath of office, the The chief of police shall attest in writing to the commission that the individual to whom the oath was administered satisfies the licensing standards by submitting an executed affidavit, and a copy of the executed oath of office, and any other documents required by the commission. (4) If, upon reviewing the executed affidavit and executed oath of office, the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards, Upon receipt of the documents required under this section from an employing fire department, the commission shall review the documents to determine whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. The commission may require the employing fire department to provide physical or electronic copies of the comprehensive background investigation obtained under this section or any other documents the commission considers necessary. After reviewing all the documents required under this section, the commission shall grant the individual a license, if the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards. (5) If , upon reviewing the executed affidavit and executed oath of office, the commission determines that the individual does not comply with the licensing standards, the commission may do any of the following: (a) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the affidavit and oath of office. (b) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the comprehensive background investigation, screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and other means used to verify compliance with the licensing standards. (c) Supervise Grant the individual a license if the commission determines that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and or other means used to determine compliance with the licensing standards.of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, provided that the individual agrees to do both of the following: (i) Comply with any additional screening, procedures, examination, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, as determined by the commission as a condition for granting the individual a license. (ii) Voluntarily relinquish the license if the individual fails to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (i). (d) Deny the issuance of a license and inform the chief of police. (6) Upon being informed that An individual is not licensed under this section until the commission grants the individual a license in accordance with this act. If the commission has denied denies the issuance of a license, the chief of police shall promptly inform the individual whose licensure was denied. (7) An individual denied a license under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in the oath of office. This subsection does not divest the individual of that authority until the individual has been informed that his or her license was denied. (7) (8) A chief of police who has administered an oath of office to an individual under this section shall do all of the following, with respect to that individual: (a) Report to the commission all personnel transactions affecting employment status in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) Report to the commission concerning any action taken by the chief of police that removes the authority conferred by the oath of office, or that restores the individual's authority to that conferred by the oath of office, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) Report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed by that individual of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (i) All criminal charges for offenses for which that individual's license may be revoked. (ii) The imposition of a personal protection order against the individual under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. (iii) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or under the laws of any other state. (iv) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subparagraph, the law enforcement agency shall specify the conviction, whether the individual is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (d) (c) Maintain an employment history record. (e) (d) Collect, verify, and maintain documentation establishing that the individual complies with the applicable licensing standards. (8) (9) An individual licensed under this section shall report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (a) Criminal charges for offenses for which that individual's license may be revoked as described in this section. , upon being informed of such charges, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) Imposition of a personal protection order against that individual after a judicial hearing under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. , upon being informed of the imposition of such an order, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or under the laws of any other state. (d) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subdivision, the individual shall specify the conviction, whether the individual is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (9) (10) A license issued under this section is rendered lapsed, without barring further licensure under this act, if 1 or both of the following occur: (a) The individual is no longer employed as a fire arson investigator from a fire department within a village, city, township, or county in this state, who is sworn and fully empowered by the chief of police of that village, city, township, or county, rendering the license lapsed. (b) The individual is subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the oath of office, rendering the license lapsed. (c) The individual failed to comply with the continuing professional education requirements prescribed in rules by the commission for 1 year after being notified by the commission through the individual's employing fire department that the individual's license has lapsed. (10) (11) The commission shall revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing these revocations under this subsection: (a) The individual obtained the license by making a materially false oral or written statement or committing fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (b) The individual obtained the license because another individual made a materially false oral or written statement or committed fraud in an affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (c) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for a violation or attempted violation of a penal law of this state or another jurisdiction that is punishable by imprisonment for more than 1 year. (d) The individual has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for violation or attempted violation of 1 or more of the following penal laws of this state or laws of another jurisdiction substantially corresponding to the penal laws of this state: (i) Section 625(1) or (8) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, if the individual has a prior conviction, as that term is defined in section 625(25)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, that occurred within 7 years of the adjudication as described in section 625(9)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625. (ii) Section 7403(2)(c) or 7404(2)(a), (b), or (c) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403 and 333.7404. (iii) Section 81(4) or 81a or a misdemeanor violation of section 411h of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, 750.81a, and 750.411h. (e) The individual is convicted of a misdemeanor involving domestic violence and is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f(5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (11) The commission may revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection: (a) The individual is a fire arson investigator with an active license at another fire department and both of the following apply: (i) The subsequent employing fire department requests the activation of the individual's law enforcement officer license under this act. (ii) The commission determines that the individual does not meet the licensing standards and denies the request of the subsequent employing fire department to activate the individual's law enforcement officer license. (b) The individual's license was activated by the commission in accordance with this act within 90 days of the commission's initiation of revocation proceedings, and both of the following apply: (i) The commission determines that the individual's license was activated in error, including an erroneous activation before the commission issued a final order determining whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. (ii) The commission determines that the individual does not comply with the licensing standards and would have denied activation of the individual's license under this act but for the error. (c) The individual's license was granted under this act based on the commission's determination that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards and the individual failed to comply with the additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards imposed by the commission to verify the individual's compliance with the licensing standards. (d) The individual is not eligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm or an ammunition under state or federal laws. (12) The following procedures and requirements apply to license revocation under this section: (a) The commission shall initiate license revocation proceedings, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order of summary suspension and notice of intent to revoke, upon obtaining notice of facts warranting license revocation. (b) A hearing for license revocation must be conducted as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (c) In lieu of participating in a contested case, an individual may voluntarily and permanently relinquish his or her the individual's law enforcement officer license by executing before a notary public an affidavit of license relinquishment prescribed by the commission. (d) The commission need not delay or abate license revocation proceedings based on an adjudication of guilt if an appeal is taken from the adjudication of guilt. (e) If the commission issues a final decision or order to revoke a license, that decision or order is subject to judicial review as provided in the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A summary suspension described in this section is not a final decision or order for purposes of judicial review. (13) An Only an individual licensed with an active law enforcement license issued under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in the oath of office if any of the following occur:this state. (a) The individual's license is rendered void by a court order or other operation of law. (b) The individual's license is revoked. (c) The individual's license is rendered lapsed. Sec. 9d. (1) This section applies only to individuals who meet all of the following conditions: (a) Are employed as private college security officers under section 37 of the private security business and security alarm act, 1968 PA 330, MCL 338.1087. (b) Seek licensure under this act. (c) Are sworn and fully empowered by a chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency, or are deputized by a county sheriff as a deputy sheriff, excluding deputation as a special deputy. (2) The authority to enforce the laws of this state of private college security officers to whom this section applies is subject to the licensing requirements and procedures of this section and section sections 9e and 9f. An individual who seeks admission to a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy or a regional basic law enforcement training academy or the recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for purposes of licensure under this section shall submit to fingerprinting as provided in section 11(3). (3) The commission shall promulgate rules governing licensing standards and procedures, pertaining to the following: (a) Subject to section sections 9e and 9f, training requirements that may be met by completing either of the following: (i) Preenrollment requirements, courses of study, attendance requirements, and instructional hours at an agency basic law enforcement training academy, a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy, or a regional basic law enforcement training academy. (ii) The recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program for granting a waiver from the licensing standard specified in subparagraph (i). (b) Proficiency on a licensing examination administered after compliance with the licensing standard specified in subdivision (a). (c) Physical ability. (d) Psychological fitness. (e) Education. (f) Reading and writing proficiency. (g) Minimum age. (h) Whether or not a valid operator's or chauffeur's license is required for licensure. (i) Character fitness, as determined by a comprehensive background investigation supported by a written authorization and release waiver executed by the individual for whom licensure is sought. The waiver and comprehensive background investigation required under this subdivision must contain information required by the commission. The waiver must be in a form prescribed by the commission. (j) Whether or not United States citizenship is required for licensure. (k) Employment as a private college security officer as defined in section 37 of the private security business and security alarm act, 1968 PA 330, MCL 338.1087, who is sworn and fully empowered by the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency, or deputized by a county sheriff as a deputy sheriff, excluding deputation as a special deputy. (l) The form and manner for execution of a written oath of office by the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency, or by a county sheriff, and the content of the written oath conferring the authority to enforce the general criminal laws of this state. (m) The ability to be licensed and employed as a law enforcement officer under this section, without a restriction otherwise imposed by law. (4) The licensure process under this section must follow the following procedures: (a) Before executing the oath of office, the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff shall verify do both of the following: (i) Verify that the private college security officer to whom the oath is administered complies with the licensing standards. If the individual is a licensed law enforcement officer who is or was employed by another chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency, or by a county sheriff, the verification and attestation to compliance with licensing standards of the subsequent chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency, or by a county sheriff, may exclude the licensing standards described in subsection (3)(a), (b), and (e) to (g). (ii) If applicable, verify in writing that it has reviewed the individual's separation of service record as required under the law enforcement officer separation of service record act, 2017 PA 128, MCL 28.561 to 28.565. (b) The chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff shall require the private college security officer to execute an a written oath of office. authorizing the private college security officer to enforce the general criminal laws of this state. (c) Not more than 10 calendar days after executing the oath of office, the The chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff shall attest in writing to the commission that the private college security officer to whom the oath was administered satisfies the licensing standards by submitting an executed affidavit, and a copy of the executed oath of office, and any other documents required by the commission. (5) If upon reviewing the executed affidavit and oath of office the commission determines that the private college security officer complies with the licensing standards, Upon receipt of the documents required under this section from the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff, the commission shall review the documents to determine whether the individual complies with the licensing standards. The commission may require the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff to provide physical or electronic copies of the comprehensive background investigation obtained under this section or any other documents the commission considers necessary. After reviewing all the documents required under this section, the commission shall grant the private college security officer a license if the commission determines that the individual complies with the licensing standards. (6) If upon reviewing the executed affidavit and oath of office the commission determines that the private college security officer does not comply with the licensing standards, the commission may do any of the following: (a) Supervise remediation of errors or omissions in the affidavit or oath of office. (b) Supervise the remediation of errors or omissions in the comprehensive background investigation, screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and other means used to verify compliance with the licensing standards. (c) Supervise Grant the private college security officer a license if the commission determines that the individual can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, and other means used to determine compliance with the licensing standards.of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, provided that the private college security officer agrees to do both of the following: (i) Comply with any additional screening, procedures, examination, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards, as determined by the commission as a condition for granting the private college security officer a license. (ii) Voluntarily relinquish the license if the private college security officer fails to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (i). (d) Deny the issuance of a license and inform the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff of the denial. (7) Upon being informed that An individual is not licensed under this section until the commission grants the individual a license in accordance with this act. If the commission has denied denies the issuance of a license, the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff shall promptly inform the private college security officer seeking licensure that he or she the private college security officer has been denied issuance of a license under this section. (8) A private college security officer denied a license under this section may not exercise the law enforcement authority described in the oath of office. This subsection does not divest the private college security officer of that authority until the private college security officer has been informed that his or her licensure was denied. (8) (9) A chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or a county sheriff who has administered an oath of office to a private college security officer under this section shall, with respect to that private college security officer, do all of the following: (a) Report to the commission concerning all personnel transactions affecting employment status, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) Report to the commission concerning any action taken by the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff that removes the authority conferred by the oath of office or that restores the private college security officer's authority conferred by the oath of office, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) Report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed by that private college security officer of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (i) All criminal charges for offenses for which that private college security officer's license may be revoked. (ii) The imposition of a personal protection order against the private college security officer under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the laws of any other jurisdiction. (iii) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or under the laws of any other state. (iv) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subparagraph, the law enforcement agency shall specify the conviction, whether the private college security officer is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (d) (c) Maintain an employment history record. (e) (d) Collect, verify, and maintain documentation establishing that the private college security officer complies with the applicable licensing standards. (9) (10) If a private college or university appoints an individual as a private college security officer under section 37 of the private security business and security alarm act, 1968 PA 330, MCL 338.1087, and the private college security officer is licensed under this section, the private college or university, with respect to the private college security officer, shall do all of the following: (a) Report to the commission all personnel transactions affecting employment status in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) Report to the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or the county sheriff who administered the oath of office to that private college security officer all personnel transactions affecting employment status, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (10) (11) A private college security officer licensed under this section shall report all of the following to the commission immediately upon being informed of the imposition of the charges, order, restriction, or filing of the order in a court of competent jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission: (a) Criminal charges for offenses for which the private college security officer's license may be revoked as described in this section. upon being informed of such charges and in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (b) The imposition of a personal protection order against the private college security officer after a judicial hearing under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or under the law of any other jurisdiction. , upon being informed of the imposition of such an order, in a manner prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. (c) The imposition of an extreme risk protection order under section 7 of the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1807, or the laws of any other states. (d) A conviction that is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. For purposes of this subdivision, the private college security officer shall specify the conviction, whether the private college security officer is ineligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state, and the expiration period for the restriction as described under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (11) (12) A license granted under this section is rendered lapsed, without barring further licensure under this act, if 1 or both of the following occur: (a) The private college security officer is no longer employed as a private college security officer appointed under section 37 of the private security business and security alarm act, 1968 PA 330, MCL 338.1087, who is sworn and fully empowered by the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency, or deputized by a county sheriff as a deputy sheriff, excluding deputation as a special deputy, rendering the license lapsed. (b) The private college security officer is subjected to a removal of the authority conferred by the oath of office, rendering the license lapsed. (c) The private college security officer failed to comply with the continuing professional education requirements prescribed in rules by the commission for 1 year after being notified by the commission through the private college security officer's employer that the private college security officer's license has lapsed. (12) (13) The commission shall revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following and shall promulgate rules governing these revocations: (a) The private college security officer obtained the license by making a materially false oral or written statement or committing fraud in the affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (b) The private college security officer obtained the license because another person made a materially false oral or written statement or committed fraud in the affidavit, disclosure, or application to a law enforcement training academy, the commission, or a law enforcement agency at any stage of recruitment, selection, appointment, enrollment, training, or licensure application. (c) The private college security officer has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for a violation or attempted violation of a penal law of this state or another jurisdiction that is punishable by imprisonment for more than 1 year. (d) The private college security officer has been subjected to an adjudication of guilt for a violation or attempted violation of 1 or more of the following penal laws of this state or another jurisdiction substantially corresponding to the penal laws of this state: (i) Section 625(1) or (8) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, if the individual has a prior conviction, as that term is defined in section 625(25)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, that occurred within 7 years of the adjudication as described in section 625(9)(b) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625. (ii) Section 7403(2)(c) or 7404(2)(a), (b), or (c) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403 and 333.7404. (iii) Section 81(4) or 81a or a misdemeanor violation of section 411h of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, 750.81a, and 750.411h. (e) The private college security officer is convicted of a misdemeanor involving domestic violence and is subject to the restrictions described under section 224f(5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (13) The commission may revoke a license granted under this section for any of the following circumstances and shall promulgate rules governing revocations under this subsection: (a) The private college security officer is a law enforcement officer with an active license and both of the following apply: (i) A chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or a county sheriff who has administered an oath of office to a private college security officer under this section requests the activation of the private college security officer's law enforcement officer license under this act. (ii) The commission determines that the private college security officer does not meet the licensing standards and denies the request of the chief of police of a village, city, or township law enforcement agency or a county sheriff who has administered an oath of office to a private college security officer under this section to activate the private college security officer's law enforcement officer license. (b) The private college security officer's license was activated by the commission in accordance with this act within 90 days of the commission's initiation of revocation proceedings, and both of the following apply: (i) The commission determines that the private college security officer's license was activated in error, including an erroneous activation before the commission issued a final order determining whether the private college security officer complies with the licensing standards. (ii) The commission determines that the private college security officer does not comply with the licensing standards and would have denied activation of the private college security officer's license under this act but for the error. (c) The private college security officer's license was granted under this act based on the commission's determination that the private college security officer can be brought into compliance with the licensing standards with additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards and the private college security officer failed to comply with the additional screening, procedures, examinations, testing, or other means of verifying compliance with the licensing standards imposed by the commission to verify the private college security officer's compliance with the licensing standards. (d) The private college security officer is not eligible to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm or an ammunition under state or federal laws. (14) The following procedures and requirements apply to license revocation under this section: (a) The commission shall initiate license revocation proceedings, including, but not limited to, the issuance of an order for summary suspension and notice of intent to revoke a license upon obtaining notice of facts warranting license revocation. (b) A hearing for license revocation must be conducted as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (c) In lieu of participating in a contested case, a private security college security officer may voluntarily and permanently relinquish his or her the private college security officer's law enforcement officer license under this section by executing before a notary public an affidavit of license relinquishment as prescribed by the commission. (d) The commission need not delay or abate license revocation proceedings based on an adjudication of guilt if an appeal is taken from the adjudication of guilt. (e) If the commission issues a final decision or order to revoke a license, that decision or order is subject to judicial review as provided in the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A summary suspension described in this section is not a final decision or order for purposes of judicial review. (15) A Only a private college security officer licensed with an active license issued under this section shall not exercise the law enforcement authority described in the oath of office he or she executed if any of the following occur:in this state. (a) The private college security officer's license is rendered void by a court order or other operation of law. (b) The private college security officer's license is revoked. (c) The private college security officer's license is rendered lapsed. Sec. 11. (1) The commission may do 1 or more of the following: (a) Enter into agreements with colleges, universities, governmental agencies, and private entities to carry out the intent of this act. (b) Issue certificates of approval to agency basic law enforcement training academies, preservice college basic law enforcement training academies, and regional basic law enforcement training academies. (c) Authorize issuance of certificates of graduation or diplomas by agency basic law enforcement training academies, preservice college basic law enforcement training academies, and regional basic law enforcement training academies to students who have satisfactorily completed minimum courses of study. (d) Cooperate with state, federal, and local agencies to approve continuing professional education programs of in-service instruction and training of law enforcement officers of this state and of cities, counties, townships, and villages. (e) Make recommendations to the legislature on matters pertaining to qualification and training of law enforcement officers. (f) Require a licensing examination. (g) Establish a recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program. (h) Establish and charge a fee to recover the cost of screening, enrolling, evaluating, and testing individuals who are not employed by a law enforcement agency, which must be deposited in the law enforcement officers training fund created in this section. (i) Establish and charge a fee to recover the cost of issuing licenses to persons licensed under this act. , which The fees collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the law enforcement officers training fund created in this section. (2) The commission may promulgate rules with respect to any of the following: (a) In-service training Continuing professional education programs and minimum courses of study and attendance requirements for licensed law enforcement officers. (b) The establishment and approval of agency basic law enforcement training academies, preservice college basic law enforcement training academies, and regional basic law enforcement training academies. (c) The minimum qualifications for instructors for approved agency basic law enforcement training academies, preservice college basic law enforcement training academies, and regional basic law enforcement training academies. (d) The minimum facilities and equipment for agency basic law enforcement training academies, preservice college basic law enforcement training academies, and regional basic law enforcement training academies. (e) Minimum standards Standards and procedures for reserve officers. (3) The commission shall require an individual seeking admission to a preservice college basic law enforcement training academy or a regional basic law enforcement training academy or the recognition of prior basic law enforcement training and experience program to submit his or her the individual's fingerprints to the department of state police for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record information check. The department of state police may charge a fee for conducting a criminal history record information check. The individual shall submit his or her the individual's fingerprints to the department of state police in a manner prescribed by the department of state police. (4) The commission shall develop a model duty to intervene policy. (5) (4) The department of state police shall conduct a criminal history record information check on each individual described under subsection (3) through its own records and through the Federal Bureau of Investigation. After the completion of each criminal history record information check, the department of state police shall provide the criminal history record information to the commission. (6) (5) The department of state police shall store and retain fingerprints submitted under this section in an automated fingerprint identification system that provides for an automatic notification if subsequent criminal history record information matches fingerprints previously submitted under this section. Upon receiving a notification under this subsection, the department of state police shall forward that notification to the commission. (7) (6) The department of state police shall forward the fingerprints submitted under this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to be retained in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's next generation identification system and integrated automated fingerprint identification system that provides for automatic notification if subsequent criminal history record information matches fingerprints previously submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation under this subsection. Upon receiving a notification from the Federal Bureau of Investigation under this subsection, the department of state police shall forward that notification to the commission. The fingerprints retained under this subsection may be searched by using future submissions to those systems, including, but not limited to, latent fingerprint searches, with appropriate responses sent to the submitting and subscribing entities. This subsection does not apply unless the department of state police is capable of participating in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's next generation identification system and integrated automated fingerprint identification system. (8) (7) The law enforcement officers training fund is created within the state treasury. (9) (8) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (10) (9) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall must remain in the fund, shall must not lapse into the general fund, and may be used by the commission, upon appropriation, in future fiscal years as prescribed in this section. (11) (10) The commission shall be is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (12) (11) The commission shall expend money from the fund, upon appropriation, to carry out its responsibilities under this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 334. (b) Senate Bill No. 335.